Utah statutes.
40-8-2.   Legislative findings.
The Utah Legislature finds that:
(1)  A mining industry is essential to the economic and physical well-being of
the state of Utah and the nation.
(2)  It is necessary to alter the surface of the earth to extract minerals
required by our society, but this should be done in such a way as to minimize
undesirable effects on the surroundings.
(3)  Mined land should be reclaimed so as to prevent conditions detrimental to
the general safety and welfare of the citizens of the state and to provide for
the subsequent use of the lands affected. Reclamation requirements must be
adapted to the diversity of topographic, chemical, climatic, biologic,
geologic, economic, and social conditions in the areas where mining takes
place.
